Arkansas, session 2025, HB1221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-9-103, concerning the signing of
initiative or referendum petitions, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(e) A signature on an initiative or referendum petition is not valid
and shall not be counted for any purpose if the signature was obtained after
the date of the next general election following the certification of the
ballot title and popular name under § 7-9-107.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-9-107, concerning the filing of the
original draft of a proposed measure with the Attorney General before
circulation, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(g) The certification of a ballot title and popular name under this
section shall expire on the date of the next general election after the
certification of the ballot title and popular name.

*MBM044*
01/17/2025 10:19:28 AM MBM044

HB1221

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-9-126(c), concerning the counting of
signatures on initiative and referendum petitions, is amended to read as
follows:
(c) The following signatures shall not be counted for any purpose by
the official charged with verifying the signatures, including the initial
count of signatures:
(1) A signature that is not an original signature;
(2) A signature that is obviously not that of the purported
petitioner;
(3) A signature that is illegible;
(4) A signature that is not accompanied by personally
identifying information;
(5) A signature for which the corresponding printed name,
address, birth date, or date of signing is written by someone other than the
signer except under circumstances of disability of the signer;
(6) A signature obtained before the submission and approval of
the ballot title under § 7-9-107;
(7) A signature obtained after the date of the next general
election following the certification of the ballot title and popular name
under § 7-9-107; and
(7)(8) A signature that has any other material defect that, on
its face, renders the signature invalid.

SECTION 4. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are declared to
be severable and the invalidity of any provision of this act shall not affect
other provisions of the act which can be given effect without the invalid
provision.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the process for citizens to
propose initiated acts and amendments to the Arkansas Constitution is
critical to a well-functioning democracy in this state; that it is of the
utmost importance that the integrity of the initiative process be
strengthened through this act so that voters maintain a high degree of
confidence in the actions of government; that few things are more important
01/17/2025 10:19:28 AM MBM044

HB1221
to the public peace, health, and safety than maintaining trust in the actions
of government; that the changes to the initiative process under this act are
critical to ensure that integrity is maintained in the initiative process;
and that any delay in the implementation of this act would disrupt the
initiative process for the 2026 general election, which would have a
detrimental effect on the public peace, health, and safety of Arkansas.
Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately
necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall
become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.





















01/17/2025 10:19:28 AM MBM044